Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Chapter 14. Health Insurance Credits for Certain Retirees.

§ 51.1-1400.
Health insurance credits for retired state employees.

The Commonwealth shall provide a credit toward the cost of health insurance coverage for any former state employee, as defined in §

2.2-2818

, who retired under the Virginia Retirement System, State Police Officers’ Retirement System, Judicial Retirement System, Virginia Law Officers’ Retirement System, or any retirement system authorized pursuant to §

51.1-126

,

51.1-126

.1,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126.5

,

51.1-126.7

, or

51.1-169

and who (i) rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service under the Retirement System or (ii) rendered service as a temporary employee of the General Assembly in 1972 and became a member of the retirement system from 1972 to 1985 immediately following such temporary service. The amount of each monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be $4 per year of creditable service, which amount shall be credited monthly to any retired state employee participating in the state retiree health benefits program pursuant to §

51.1-1405

or an alternative personal health insurance plan as provided herein. However, such credit shall not exceed the health insurance premium for retiree-only coverage as provided under such alternative personal health insurance plan. Any (i) employee participant pursuant to § 51.1-126,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126.5

, or

51.1-126.7

receiving long-term disability, or (ii) retired state employee retired under the provisions of §

51.1-156

or

51.1-307

, or (iii) any participating employee receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1112

,

51.1-1123

,

51.1-1157

, or

51.1-1165

shall receive a maximum monthly credit which is the greater of (i) $120, (ii) $4 per year for each year of creditable service at the time of disability retirement, or (iii) $4 per year for each year of creditable service at the time of eligibility for long-term disability. Any person included in the membership of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) who elects to defer his retirement pursuant to subsection C of §

51.1-153

, subsection C of §

51.1-205

or subsection C of §

51.1-305

shall be entitled to receive the allowable credit provided by this section on the effective date of his retirement.

For those retired state employees:

Participating in the state retiree health benefits program, such credit shall be applied to the monthly premium deducted from benefits payable to retired state employees in accordance with Chapters 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), and 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.). In the event that either no benefit is payable or the benefit payable is insufficient to deduct the entire health care premium, the payment of the credit shall be determined in the manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System. Eligibility for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

Not electing or eligible to participate in the state retiree health benefits program and who purchase an alternative personal health insurance policy from a carrier or organization of his own choosing, such retirees shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subsection A. Eligibility for the credit and payment for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

Any person included in the membership of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) who (i) rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service as a state employee as defined in §

2.2-2818

and (ii) after terminating state service, was employed by a local government that does not elect to provide a health insurance credit under §

51.1-1401

or

51.1-1402

, shall be eligible for the credit provided by subsection A, provided that the retired employee is participating in a health insurance plan. The Commonwealth shall be charged with the credit as provided for in subsection D. In such case, the health insurance credit shall be determined based upon the amount of state service or service as a teacher, whichever is greater.

The Virginia Retirement System shall actuarially determine the amount necessary to fund all credits provided by this section to reflect the cost of such credits in the employer contribution rate pursuant to §

51.1-145

, and prescribe such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The costs associated with the administration of the health insurance credit program provided for in this section shall be recovered from the health insurance credit trust fund.

Notwithstanding anything contained in this section to the contrary, the Virginia Commonwealth University Health System Authority shall pay the cost of coverage for employees of such Authority who (i) retired under the Virginia Retirement System or any retirement system authorized pursuant to §

23.1-2416

,

51.1-126

,

51.1-126

.1, or former §

51.1-126.2

; (ii) were employed by such Authority prior to July 1, 1998, and were not subsequently rehired by such Authority on or after July 1, 1998; and (iii) served no less than 15 years of creditable service as regularly employed full-time employees of such Authority or the Commonwealth.

History.

1989, c. 664, § 2.1-20.1:2; 1992, c. 770; 1993, cc. 743, 938; 1995, cc. 612, 734; 1998, cc. 195, 449, 676; 1999, cc. 832, 980, 984; 2000, cc. 720, 911; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 79; 2005, c. 535; 2006, c. 622; 2007, c. 64; 2012, cc. 701, 823.

The numbers of §§

51.1-1400

to

51.1-1405

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the numbers in the 2001 act having been

51.1-1300

to 51.1-1305.

Cross references.

For note regarding the recodification of

Titles 2.1

and 9 as new

Titles 2.2

and 9.1, and accompanying revision of other material, see the note under §

2.2-100

.

As to eligibility of employees of Virginia Commercial Space Flight Authority to health insurance credit, see §

2.2-2203.3

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, cc. 980 and 984, cl. 2 provides: “That any former state employee or teacher who has been ineligible to receive the health insurance credit pursuant to § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 [see now §

51.1-1400

or §

51.1-1401

] of the Code of Virginia as in effect prior to the enactment of this act, but would be eligible to receive the health insurance credit pursuant to § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 as amended by this act, shall be prospectively entitled to receive the health insurance credit in accordance with the requirements of § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 as amended by this act and other applicable law, provided application for the health insurance credit is made by such former employee to the Virginia Retirement System within 180 days following the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2001, c. 844, cl. 14, effective October 1, 2001, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2001.”

Acts 2006, c. 622, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall affect the amount of health insurance credits provided on and after July 1, 2006, and shall apply to applicable employees who retired prior to July 1, 2006, as well as those who retire on or after July 1, 2006.”

Acts 2006, c. 622, which amended subsection A, in cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not become effective unless an appropriation of funds effectuating the purposes of this act is included in the general appropriation act for the period of July 1, 2006, through June 30, 2008, passed during the 2006 Session of the General Assembly and signed into law by the Governor.” Funding was provided in Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 3, Item 461 P.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “23.1-2416” was substituted for “23-50.16:24.1” in subsection E to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 79, throughout the section, substituted “15” for “fifteen” and “this title” for “Title 51.1”; in subsection A, inserted “§” preceding “§

51.1-126

” and inserted “51.1-126.1,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126

.5, and

51.1-126.7

” following “51.1-126” in the first sentence, substituted “$4” for “four dollars” in the second sentence, and inserted “or from any retirement system authorized pursuant to §§ 51.1-126,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126.5

and

51.1-126.7

for reason of disability” in the fourth sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 535, in subsection A, substituted “(i) employee participant pursuant to §

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126

.5, or

51.1-126.7

receiving long-term disability, or (ii) retired state employee retired under the provisions of §

51.1-156

or 51.31-307” for “retired state employee retired under the provisions of §§

51.1-156

and

51.1-307

or from any retirement system authorized pursuant to §§ 51.1-126,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126.5

and

51.1-126.7

for reason of disability”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 622, in subsection A, deleted “not to exceed a maximum monthly allowance of $120” following “creditable service” in the second sentence and substituted the language beginning “a maximum monthly” and ending “long-term disability” for “the maximum credit provided by this section” in the fourth sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 64, in subsection A, substituted “§

51.1-126

,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126

.5, or” for “§§ 51.1-126,

51.1-126.1

,

51.1-126.3

,

51.1-126.4

,

51.1-126.5

, and” in the first sentence and inserted clause (iii) following the first instance of clause (ii) in the fourth sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are identical, and in subsection A inserted “or

51.1-169

” in the first sentence and “51.1-1157, or

51.1-1165

” in the fourth sentence and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 51.1-1401.
Health insurance credits for retired teachers.

A teacher, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, retired under the Virginia Retirement System, including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, and any employee retired under a defined contribution plan pursuant to §

51.1-126.6

, who rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service under the System or plan shall receive a health insurance credit to his monthly retirement allowance, which shall be applied to reduce the retired member’s health insurance premium cost. The amount of each monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be $4 for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service; however, each former member whose retirement was for disability, any employee participant pursuant to §

51.1-126.6

receiving long-term disability, a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

, or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

shall receive a monthly health insurance credit of $4 multiplied by the smaller of (i) twice the amount of his creditable service or (ii) the amount of creditable service he would have completed at age 60 if he had remained in service to that age. Eligibility for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System. Any member who elects to defer his retirement pursuant to subsection C of §

51.1-153

shall be entitled to receive the allowable credit provided by this section on the effective date of his retirement.

Those retired employees who purchase an alternative personal health insurance policy from a carrier or organization of their own choosing shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subsection D. Eligibility for the credit and payment of the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

The credit shall be in (i) the amount provided in subsection A or (ii) the amount of premium paid for the personal health insurance policy, whichever is less.

Any person included in the membership of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) who (i) rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service as a teacher as defined in §

51.1-124.3

and (ii) after terminating service as a teacher, was employed by a local government that does not elect to provide a health insurance credit under §

51.1-1402

, shall be eligible for the credit provided by subsection A and subsection B if provided by the school division from which the service described in clause (i) was rendered, provided that the retired employee is participating in a health insurance plan. The Commonwealth and local school division, if appropriate, shall be charged with the credit as provided for in subsection E. In such case, the health insurance credit shall be determined based upon the amount of state service or service as a teacher, whichever is greater.

The Virginia Retirement System shall (i) actuarially determine the amount necessary to fund all credits provided under this section; (ii) reflect the cost of such credits in the applicable employer contribution rate pursuant to §§

51.1-145

,

51.1-204

, and

51.1-304

; and (iii) prescribe such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The costs associated with the administration of the health insurance program provided for in this section shall be recovered from the health insurance credit trust fund.

History.

1992, c. 770, § 2.1-20.1:3; 1993, cc. 743, 938; 1995, cc. 612, 734; 1996, c. 764; 1998, cc. 195, 676; 1999, cc. 832, 980, 984; 2000, c. 911; 2001, c. 844; 2004, c. 84; 2007, cc. 866, 921; 2009, c. 23; 2011, c. 722; 2012, cc. 701, 823.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1999, cc. 980 and 984, cl. 2 provides: “That any former state employee or teacher who has been ineligible to receive the health insurance credit pursuant to § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 [see now §

51.1-1400

or §

51.1-1401

] of the Code of Virginia as in effect prior to the enactment of this act, but would be eligible to receive the health insurance credit pursuant to § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 as amended by this act, shall be prospectively entitled to receive the health insurance credit in accordance with the requirements of § 2.1-20.1:2 or § 2.1-20.1:3 as amended by this act and other applicable law, provided application for the health insurance credit is made by such former employee to the Virginia Retirement System within 180 days following the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2007, cc. 866 and 921, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to all employees eligible to receive benefits under this act, regardless of whether such employee retired prior to or after July 1, 2007. However, the increased health insurance credit paid under this act shall only be available on a prospective basis, beginning July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2007, cc. 866 and 921, cl. 3 provides: “That the total health insurance credit available to any retired employee under this act shall be the $4 provided under subsection A of §

51.1-1401

of the Code of Virginia, regardless of whether such employee was receiving an additional $1 health insurance credit available under subsection B of § 51.1.-1401 as it was in effect on July 1, 2006.”

Acts 2007, cc. 866 and 921, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any former member, retired prior to July 1, 2007, whose retirement was for disability, if such application would reduce the monthly health insurance credit payable to such former member.”

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 145 C 2 b, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “Notwithstanding §

51.1-1401

, Code of Virginia, the Commonwealth shall provide payments for only the state share of the Standards of Quality fringe benefit cost of the retiree health care credit. This Item includes payments in both years based on the state share of fringe benefit costs of 55 percent of the employer’s cost on funded Standards of Quality instructional and support positions, distributed based on the composite index of the local ability-to-pay.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 84, in subsection A, inserted “and any employee retired under a defined contribution plan pursuant to §

51.1-126.6

,” substituted “15” for “fifteen,” and inserted “or plan” in the first sentence, and substituted “$2.50” for “two dollars and fifty cents” and “$75” for “seventy-five dollars” in two places in the second sentence; in subsection B, substituted “$1” for “one dollar” and “$30” for “thirty dollars” in the first sentence; and in subsection E, substituted “this title” for “Title 51.1” and “15” for “fifteen” in the first sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 866 and 921 are identical, and in subsection A, substituted “$4” for “$2.50,” deleted “not to exceed a maximum monthly credit of $75” following “member’s creditable service” and substituted “$4 multiplied by the smaller of (i) twice the amount of his creditable service or (ii) the amount of creditable service he would have completed at age 60 if he had remained in service to that age” for “$75” at the end of the second sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The cost of such credit shall be borne by the Commonwealth.”; deleted former subsection B, which read: “In addition to the health insurance credit authorized in subsection A, localities which participate in the Virginia Retirement System may elect to provide an additional health insurance credit of $1 per month for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service, not to exceed a maximum monthly credit of $30. The costs of such additional health insurance credit shall be borne by the locality.”; redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection C, deleted “or subsection A and subsection B if the additional credit authorized by subsection B is provided” at the end of clause (i).

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 23 substituted “subsection E” for “subsection F” at the end of the next-to-last sentence in subsection D.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 722 inserted “or any employee participant pursuant to §

51.1-126.6

receiving long-term disability” preceding “shall receive a monthly health insurance credit” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and inserted “including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” in the first sentence and “or a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

” in the second sentence of subsection A; and made minor punctuation and stylistic changes throughout the section. Acts 2012, c. 823 also inserted “or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

” in subsection A.

§ 51.1-1402.
Health insurance credits for retired local government employees.

Retired local government employees, other than employees of a local school division who are not teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, whose localities have elected to participate in the Virginia Retirement System, including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, who have rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service under the System shall receive a health insurance credit to their monthly retirement allowance, which shall be applied to reduce the retired member’s health insurance premium cost, provided the retiree’s employer elects to participate in the credit program. The amount of each monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be $1.50 for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service, not to exceed a maximum monthly credit of $45; however, each former member whose retirement was for disability, a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

, or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

shall receive a monthly health insurance credit of $45. Eligibility for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System. Any member who elects to defer his retirement pursuant to subsection C of §

51.1-153

shall be entitled to receive the allowable credit provided by this section on the effective date of his retirement.

Those retired employees who purchase an alternative policy from a carrier or organization of their own choosing shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subsection C. Eligibility for the credit and payment of the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

The credit shall be in the amount provided in subsection A or the amount of premium paid for the personal health insurance policy, whichever is less.

The cost of the monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be borne by the locality.

The Virginia Retirement System shall actuarially determine the amount necessary to fund all credits provided under this section, reflect the cost of such credits in the applicable employer contribution rate pursuant to §

51.1-145

, and prescribe such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The costs associated with the administration of the health insurance credit program provided for in this section shall be recovered from the health insurance credit trust fund.

History.

1992, c. 770, § 2.1-20.1:4; 1993, cc. 743, 938; 1995, cc. 612, 734; 1998, cc. 195, 676; 2001, c. 844; 2012, cc. 701, 823; 2020, c. 1091.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to all eligible retired employees of a local school division who are not teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, regardless of their date of retirement. However, the health insurance credit under §

51.1-1402.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall only be available on a prospective basis for those eligible retired employees of a local school division who retired prior to July 1, 2020, but who did not receive a health insurance credit pursuant to such section prior to such date.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any former member of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia who retired prior to July 1, 2020, and whose retirement was for disability, if such application would reduce the monthly health insurance credit payable to such former member.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 4 provides: “That no health insurance credit authorized by this act shall be paid to any eligible retired employee of a local school division who is not a teacher before July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending §

51.1-1402

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective on July 1, 2021.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” and substituted “15” for “fifteen” and “credit to their monthly” for “credit to his monthly” in the first sentence, substituted “$45” for “forty-five dollars” twice and inserted “or a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

” in the second sentence, and made related punctuation changes. Acts 2012, c. 823 also inserted “or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

” in the second sentence of subsection A.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1091, effective July 1, 2021, inserted “other than employees of a local school division who are not teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 51.1-1402.1.
Health insurance credits for retired school division employees other than teachers.

Employees of a local school division who are not teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, who retired under the Virginia Retirement System, including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, and who rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service under the System shall receive a health insurance credit to their monthly retirement allowance, which shall be applied to reduce the retired member’s health insurance premium cost. The amount of each monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be $1.50 for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service; however, each former member whose retirement was for disability, participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

, or member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

shall receive a monthly health insurance credit of $1.50 multiplied by the smaller of (i) twice the amount of his creditable service or (ii) the amount of creditable service he would have completed at age 60 if he had remained in service to that age. Eligibility for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System. Any member who elects to defer his retirement pursuant to subsection C of §

51.1-153

shall be entitled to receive the allowable credit provided by this section on the effective date of his retirement.

In addition to the health insurance credit authorized in subsection A, localities may elect to provide an additional health insurance credit of $1 per month for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service. The costs of such additional health insurance credit shall be borne by the locality.

Those retired employees who purchase an alternative policy from a carrier or organization of their own choosing shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subsection D. Eligibility for the credit and payment of the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

The credit referenced in subsection C shall be in (i) the amount provided in subsection A, or subsection A and subsection B if the additional credit as authorized by subsection B is provided, or (ii) the amount of premium paid for the personal health insurance policy, whichever is less.

The Commonwealth and the locality, if appropriate, shall be charged with the credit as provided for in subsection F.

The Virginia Retirement System shall actuarially determine the amount necessary to fund all credits provided under this section, reflect the cost of such credits in the applicable employer contribution rate pursuant to §

51.1-145

, and prescribe such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The costs associated with the administration of the health insurance credit program provided for in this section shall be recovered from the health insurance credit trust fund.

History.

2020, c. 1091.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to all eligible retired employees of a local school division who are not teachers as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, regardless of their date of retirement. However, the health insurance credit under §

51.1-1402.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall only be available on a prospective basis for those eligible retired employees of a local school division who retired prior to July 1, 2020, but who did not receive a health insurance credit pursuant to such section prior to such date.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any former member of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) of Title 51.1 of the Code of Virginia who retired prior to July 1, 2020, and whose retirement was for disability, if such application would reduce the monthly health insurance credit payable to such former member.”

Acts 2020, c. 1091, cl. 4 provides: “That no health insurance credit authorized by this act shall be paid to any eligible retired employee of a local school division who is not a teacher before July 1, 2021.”

§ 51.1-1403.
Health insurance credits for retired constitutional officers, employees of constitutional officers, general registrars, employees of general registrars, and local social service employees.

A local officer, as defined in §

51.1-124.3

, general registrar, employee of a general registrar, or an employee of a local social services board, retired under the Virginia Retirement System, including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

, who rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service under the System shall receive a health insurance credit to his monthly retirement allowance, which shall be applied to reduce the retired member’s health insurance premium cost. The amount of each monthly health insurance credit payable under this section shall be $1.50 for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service, not to exceed a maximum monthly credit of $45; however, each former member whose retirement was for disability, a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

, or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

shall receive a monthly health insurance credit of $45. Eligibility for the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System. Any member who elects to defer his retirement pursuant to subsection C of §

51.1-153

shall be entitled to receive the allowable credit provided by this section on the effective date of his retirement. The cost of such credit shall be borne by the Commonwealth.

In addition to the health insurance credit authorized in subsection A, localities which participate in the Virginia Retirement System may elect to provide an additional health insurance credit of $1 per month for each full year of the retired member’s creditable service, not to exceed a maximum monthly credit of $30. The costs of such additional health insurance credit shall be borne by the locality.

Those retired employees who purchase an alternative personal health insurance policy from a carrier or organization of their own choosing shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subdivision C 2. Eligibility for the credit and payment of the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.
C. 1. Those retired employees who purchase an alternative personal health insurance policy from a carrier or organization of their own choosing shall be eligible to receive a credit in the amount specified in subdivision C 2. Eligibility for the credit and payment of the credit shall be determined in a manner prescribed by the Virginia Retirement System.

The credit shall be in (i) the amount provided in subsection A, or subsection A and subsection B if the additional credit authorized by subsection B is provided or (ii) the amount of premium paid for the personal health insurance policy, whichever is less.

Any person included in the membership of a retirement system provided by Chapter 1 (§

51.1-124.1

et seq.), 2 (§

51.1-200

et seq.), 2.1 (§

51.1-211

et seq.), or 3 (§

51.1-300

et seq.) who (i) rendered at least 15 years of total creditable service as a local officer as defined in §

51.1-124.3

or as an employee of a local social services board or combined service as a general registrar or an employee of a general registrar and (ii) after terminating service as a local officer or employee of a local social services board or general registrar or as an employee of a general registrar, was employed by a local government that does not elect to provide a health insurance credit under §

51.1-1402

, shall be eligible for the credit provided by subsection A, provided that the retired employee is participating in a health insurance plan. The Commonwealth shall be charged with the credit as provided for in subsection A. In such case, the health insurance credit shall be determined based upon the amount of state service or service as a local officer or service as an employee of a local social services board or combined service as a general registrar or an employee of a general registrar, whichever is greater.

The Virginia Retirement System shall (i) actuarially determine the amount necessary to fund all credits provided under this section, (ii) reflect the cost of such credits in the applicable employer contribution rate pursuant to §

51.1-145

, and (iii) prescribe such terms and conditions as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section. The costs associated with the administration of the health insurance program provided for in this section shall be recovered from the health insurance credit trust fund.

History.

1997, c. 989, § 2.1-20.1:7; 2000, c. 517; 2001, c. 844; 2005, cc. 382, 432; 2006, c. 336; 2012, cc. 701, 823.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 701 and 823, cl. 2 provides: “That any person who, as of January 1, 2013, has an agreement for the purchase of prior service shall be allowed to complete the purchase of prior service at the rate provided under the existing agreement.”

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 75 P, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

51.1-1403

A, Code of Virginia, the Compensation Board is hereby authorized to deduct, from reimbursements made each year to localities out of the amounts in Items 68, 70, 71, 72, 73, and 74 of this act, an amount equal to each locality’s retiree health premium paid by the Compensation Board on behalf of the constitutional offices, directors of finance, and regional jails.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 382 inserted the present subsection D and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment by c. 432, inserted “general registrars, employees of general registrars” in the catchline; inserted “general registrar, employee of a general registrar” in the first sentence of subsection A; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 336, in subsection D, inserted “or combined service as a general registrar or an employee of a general registrar” in clause (i) and in the third sentence, inserted “or general registrar or an employee of a general registrar” in clause (ii), and in the third sentence, deleted “total” following “state service or” and inserted “service as an.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 701 and 823 are nearly identical, and in subsection A, inserted “including the hybrid retirement program described in §

51.1-169

” in the first sentence and “or a participant receiving long-term disability pursuant to §

51.1-1157

or

51.1-1165

” in the second sentence. Acts 2012, c. 823 also inserted “or a member of the hybrid retirement program receiving long-term disability pursuant to coverage under subsection A of §

51.1-1153

” in the second sentence of subsection A.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A locality which makes contributions to its retirees’ health insurance may,

if it so chooses, take into account the state credit paid toward the health insurance of a retiree of a local constitutional officer. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Glenn M. Weatherholtz, Member, House of Delegates, 01-088 (10/30/01).

§ 51.1-1404.
Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 76.

Editor’s note.

Former §

51.1-1404

, which provided optional supplemental health insurance credit for retired state employees, derived from Acts 1999, c. 385, § 2.1-20.1:5; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2001, c. 844.